Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-257
Home barber services permit; requirements.

In order to maintain in good standing or renew its home barber services permit, a barber shop shall at all times operate in accordance with the requirements for operation, maintain its license in good standing, and ensure that the home barber services comply with the following requirements:

(1)(a) Clients receiving home barber services shall be in emergency or persistent circumstances which shall generally be defined as any condition sufficiently immobilizing to prevent the client from leaving the client's residence regularly to conduct routine affairs of daily living such as grocery shopping, visiting friends and relatives, attending social events, attending worship services, and other similar activities.

(b) Emergency or persistent circumstances may include such conditions or situations as:

(i) Chronic illness or injury leaving the client bedridden or with severely restricted mobility;

(ii) Extreme general infirmity such as that associated with the aging process;

(iii) Temporary conditions, including, but not limited to, immobilizing injury and recuperation from serious illness or surgery;

(iv) Having sole responsibility for the care of an invalid dependent or a mentally disabled person requiring constant attention;

(v) Mental disability that significantly limits the client in areas of functioning described in subdivision (1)(a) of this section; or

(vi) Any other condition that, in the opinion of the board, meets the general definition of emergency or persistent circumstances;

(2) The barber shop shall determine that each person receiving home barber services meets the requirements of subdivision (1) of this section and shall:

(a) Complete a client information form supplied by the board before home barber services may be provided to any client; and

(b) Keep on file the client information forms of all clients it is currently providing with home barber services or to whom it has provided such services within the past two years;

(3) The barber shop shall employ or contract with barbers licensed under the Barber Act to provide home barber services and shall not permit any person to perform any home barber services under its authority for which the person is not licensed;

(4) No client shall be left unattended while any chemical service is in progress or while any electrical appliance is in use; and

(5) Each barber shop providing home barber services shall post a daily itinerary for each barber providing home barber services. The kit used by each barber to provide home barber services shall be available for inspection at the barber shop or at the home of the client receiving the home barber services.

Laws 2020, LB755, § 27.